Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
ARTICLE 6
TRANSPORTATION OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS BY MOTOR VEHICLE

43-6-101 to 43-6-511. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article repealed, p. 2541, § 5, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This article was originally added in 1987. For amendments prior to its repeal in 1995, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. For a detailed comparison of this article prior to its repeal in 1994, see the comparative table located at the back of the index.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning transportation of hazardous and nuclear materials, see article 20 of title 42; for criminal provisions relating to hazardous waste violations, see § 18-13-112; for provisions relating to hazardous waste disposal and management, see article 15 of title 25; for provisions relating to hazardous substance incidents, see article 22 of title 29.